Utah statutes.
62A-4a-309.   Children's Account.
(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as
the "Children's Account."  The restricted account is for crediting of
contributions from private sources and from appropriate revenues received
under Section 26-2-12.5 for abuse and neglect prevention programs described in
Section 62A-4a-305.
(2)  Money shall be appropriated from the account to the division by the
Legislature under the Utah Budgetary Procedures Act, and shall be drawn upon
by the director in consultation with the executive director of the department.
(3)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), the Children's Account may be used
only to implement prevention programs described in Section 62A-4a-305, and may
only be allocated to an entity that provides a one-to-one match, comprising a
match from the community of at least 50% in cash and up to 50% in in-kind
donations, which is 25% of the total funding received from the Children's
Account.
(4) (a)  The entity that receives the statewide evaluation contract is
excepted from the cash-match provisions of Subsection (3).
(b)  Upon recommendation of the executive director and the council, the
division may reduce or waive the match requirements described in Subsection
(3) for an entity, if the division determines that imposing the requirements
would prohibit or limit the provision of services needed in a particular
geographic area.
